Utah statutes.
31A-17-607.   Hearings.
(1) (a)  Following receipt of a notice described in Subsection (2), the
insurer or health organization shall have the right to a confidential
departmental hearing at which the insurer or health organization may challenge
any determination or action by the commissioner.
(b)  The insurer or health organization shall notify the commissioner of its
request for a hearing within five days after the notification by the
commissioner under Subsections 31A-17-604(1), (2), and (3).
(c)  Upon receipt of the insurer's or health organization's request for a
hearing, the commissioner shall set a date for the hearing, which date shall
be no less than ten nor more than 30 days after the date of the insurer's or
health organization's request.
(2)  An insurer or health organization has the right to a hearing under
Subsection (1) after:
(a)  notification to an insurer or health organization by the commissioner of
an adjusted RBC report;
(b)  notification to an insurer or health organization by the commissioner
that:
(i)  the insurer's or health organization's RBC plan or revised RBC plan is
unsatisfactory; and
(ii)  the notification constitutes a regulatory action level event with
respect to the insurer or health organization;
(c)  notification to any insurer or health organization by the commissioner
that the insurer or health organization has failed to adhere to its RBC plan
or revised RBC plan and that the failure has substantial adverse effect on the
ability of the insurer or health organization to eliminate the company action
level event with respect to the insurer or health organization in accordance
with its RBC plan or revised RBC plan; or
(d)  notification to an insurer or health organization by the commissioner of
a corrective order with respect to the insurer or health organization.
